Washington statutes.
RCW 15.88.100

Commission members' votes weighted—Exception.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the vote of each of the voting members of the commission shall be weighted as provided by this subsection for the transaction of any of the business of the commission. The total voting strength of the entire voting membership of the commission shall be twelve votes. The vote of position one shall be equal to the lesser of the following: Six and one-half votes; or eleven votes times the percentage of the wine produced in the state that is produced by the person filling position one. The percentage shall be based upon the amount of wine produced in the previous calendar year and shall be rounded to the nearest ten percent. The remaining votes of the membership of the commission shall be divided equally among the remaining members of the commission.

(2) In the event that the percentage of wine produced by the producer represented by position one falls below twenty-five percent of the wine produced in this state, the weighted voting mechanism provided for in subsection (1) of this section shall cease to be effective. In that case, the voting shall be based on one vote per position.

[ 2003 c 396 s 41; 1988 c 254 s 14; 1987 c 452 s 10.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2003 c 396: See note following RCW 15.66.030.

Effective date—1988 c 254 s 14: "Section 14 of this act shall take effect July 1, 1989." [ 1988 c 254 s 15.]